Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.350

Use of moneys by local municipalities to leverage financing for energy efficiency projects.

(1) Local municipalities receiving federal stimulus moneys through the federal energy efficiency and conservation block grant program or state energy program are authorized to use those funds, subject to federal requirements, to establish loan loss reserves or toward risk reduction mechanisms, such as loan loss reserves, to leverage financing for energy efficiency projects.

(2) Interest rate subsidies, financing transaction cost subsidies, capital grants to energy users, and other forms of grants and incentives that support financing energy efficiency projects are authorized uses of federal energy efficiency funding.

(3) Financing mechanisms offered by local municipalities under this section must conform to all applicable state and federal rules and regulations.

[ 2009 c 379 s 208.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2009 c 379: See notes following RCW 70A.50.010.